Washington statutes.
RCW 18.39.280

Prearrangement contracts—Application for registration.

To apply for an original certificate of registration, a funeral establishment must:

(1) File with the board its request showing:

(a) Its name, location, and organization date;

(b) The kinds of funeral business it proposes to transact;

(c) A statement of its financial condition, management, and affairs on a form satisfactory to or furnished by the board;

(d) Documents establishing its trust, or its affiliation with a master trust, and the names and addresses of the trustees if a trust is to be used to finance prearrangement funeral service contracts;

(e) Documents establishing its relationship with insurance carriers if insurance is to be used to finance;

(f) Documents establishing any other financing relationships; and

(g) Such other documents, stipulations, or information as the board may reasonably require to evidence compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

(2) Deposit with the director the fees required by this chapter to be paid for filing the accompanying documents, and for the certificate of registration, if granted.

[ 1989 c 390 s 6; 1986 c 259 s 68; 1982 c 66 s 7.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.

Effective dates—Transfer of records, files, and pending business—Savings—1982 c 66: See notes following RCW 18.39.240.

Fees: RCW 18.39.290.